District of Columbia statutes.
8-701

Regulations for the collection and disposal of garbage. [Repealed.]

Repealed.

Mar. 2, 1895, 28 Stat. 758, ch. 176
May 2, 2002, D.C. Law 14-116, § 6, 49 DCR 1945
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(a), 61 DCR 9971
1981 Ed., § 6-501.
1973 Ed., § 6-501.
D.C. Law 14-116 substituted “Mayor” for “Council of the District of Columbia”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 6 of Food Regulation Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-55, December 6, 2001, law notification 49 DCR 356).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6 of Food Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-128, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7939).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6 of Food Regulation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-147, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 10183).
New implementing regulations: Pursuant to this section, the following new regulations were adopted in 1983: The “Solid Waste Regulations Amendments Act of 1983” (D.C. Law 5-20, August 2, 1983, 30 DCR 3331).
For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(139) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.